District of Columbia statutes.
31-1210

Applicability.

(a)

All health maintenance organizations, life, health, property, marine, title, casualty, fidelity, surety, insurance companies and fraternal benefit associations now or hereafter incorporated or formed in the District of Columbia or authorized to do business in the District of Columbia, shall be subject to this chapter. This chapter shall also apply to Group Hospitalization and Medical Service, Incorporated, and any other company or organization whether for profit or nonprofit subject to regulation by the Insurance Administration.

(b)

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply until October 1, 1993.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-40, § 11, 40 DCR 6009
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 24(m), 44 DCR 818
1981 Ed., § 35-2710.